src/fst/morphology/incoming/bop.lexc
<{трещј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!treštjé- -> crash
<{трополј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|s]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!tropoljé- -> clatter
<{туптј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|po|[raz pto]]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!tuptjé- -> pulsate
<{тъж´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!tyžá- -> grieve
<{тънтј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!tyntjé- -> rumble
<{търч´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|za|iz|ot|pri]naimp]|s|dp]>							Des;		!tyrčá- -> run
<{т´ътра} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|za|iz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!týtra- -> drag

<{умј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[iz|pro|raz|fs sporaz|sy]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!umjéj- -> know how

<{фуч´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|pre|pro|raz]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!fučá- -> whizz
<{ф´ъфла} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[iz pto naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!fýfla- -> lisp

<{хвърч´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|za|iz|ot|po|pod|pre|raz]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!xvyrčá- -> fly
<{хл´уј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[na naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!xlúj- -> gush
<{хрущј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[iz naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!xruštjé- -> crunch
<{х´ъхра} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!xýxra- -> wheeze

<{царј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!carjé- -> reign
<{царј´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[vyz|za]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!carjí- -> reign (variant)
<{цвъртј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!cvyrtjé- -> sizzle
<{цвърч´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!cvyrčá- -> sizzle
<{църтј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!cyrtjé- -> chirp
<{цъфтј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[na|pre|pro|raz]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!cyftjé- -> bloom
<{ц´ъцра} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!cýcra- -> trickle

<{шептј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|po|[pro pto]|raz]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!šeptjé- -> whisper
<{шлј´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[za naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!šljáj- -> loaf (variant)
<{шлј´аја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[za pto naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!šljája- -> loaf
<{шумј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|na|ot|raz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!šumjé- -> be noisy
<{шумолј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|pro]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!šumoljé- -> rustle
<{шумтј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|raz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!šumtjé- -> grunt
<{шумулј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|pro]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!šumuljé- -> rustle
<{шуртј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[za naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!šurtjé- -> gush

LEXICON TPfStems
<{блјек´} 0:«CS» [o|fpre so|fraz ssy|sy]>									Des;		!-bljek´- -> dress
<{валј´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|po|pre|pro|raz|s]>								Des;		!-valjí- -> rain (variant)
<{вед´} 0:«CS» [v|do|za|iz|na|fob sza|ot|po|pod|pre|pri|pro|fpro siz|raz|s]>					Des;		!-ved´- -> lead
<{венч´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[raz|u]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!venčáj- -> marry
<{видј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|za|na|pro]nto]|pred|pri|dp]>							Des;		!vidjé- -> see
<{в´ърза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|na|ob|ot|pod|pre|pri|raz|s|dp]>							Des;		!výrza- -> tie
<{вј´еја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|iz|ot|po|raz]>									Des;		!vjéja- -> blow (variant)
<{горч´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [v|o|pod]>										Des;		!-gorčí- -> taste bitter (variant)
<{дълж´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|iz|pro|u]>									Des;		!-dylží- -> owe (variant)
<{´ем} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [za|na|po|pod|fpre sna|pri]>								Des;		!-ém- -> take (variant)
<{з´ем} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[v|fza sv|iz|fna sv|nad|fnad sv|ob|fpre sv|fsy sv]|dp]>				Des;		!zém- -> take
<(и){зограф´} dp>												isa-suff;	!(i)zograf´-isa -> paint
<{к´аза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [do|fdo siz|fdo sraz|iz|na|o|ot|po|fpod ss|fpred ss|fpre sraz|raz|u|dp]>		Des;		!káza- -> say
<{к´опча} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [v|iz|ot|s]>										Des;		!-kópča- -> clasp
<{лич´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|iz|fiz sob|fo spri|ot|fraz sob|u]>						Des;		!-ličí- -> be seen (variant)
<{н´ем} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [ot|fpre ss|s]>									Des;		!-ném- -> take (variant)
<{п´аса} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|o|pre|raz]>									Des;		!-pása- -> gird
<{помен´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [s|u]>										Des;		!-pomená- -> mention
<{правд´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] o>											Des;		!-pravdáj- -> acquit
<{прост¶рј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [raz|dp]>									Des;		!prost#rjé- -> stretch
<{п¶рј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [vyz|do|za|na|o|pod|pri|s]>								Des;		!-p#rjé- -> touch
<{рек´} 0:«CS» [v|za|iz|na|ob|ot|pred|dp]>									Des;		!rek´- -> say
<{риц´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [po|pro]>										Des;		!-ricáj- -> predict
<{св´арји} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!svárji- -> encounter
<{тъж´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|na|fpo sza|raz]>									Des;		!-tyží- -> grieve (variant)
<{търв´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [iz|o|raz]>										Des;		!-tyrvá- -> drop
<{отч´аја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!otčája- -> dispirit
<{´уј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [iz|ob]>										Des;		!-új- -> put on/off
<{ујдурд´иса} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] dp>										Des;		!ujdurdísa- -> concoct
<{хар´иза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!xaríza- -> give away
<{чет´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] sy>											Des;		!-četáj- -> combine
<{ч´уј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [do|za|fpo sraz|pri|pro|raz|s|dp]>							Des;		!čúj- -> hear
